Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska76-721
Joinder of causes of action on appeal.

Assessments made for property taken and damaged by the same condemner upon and through different property belonging to the same condemnee or condemnees may be joined in one appeal, and proceeded with in the appellate court as separate counts joined in one action for damages to such property.

Laws 1951, c. 101, § 21, p. 457.